District of Columbia statutes.
42-1005

Giving of absolute power — To owner of limited estate.

Where an absolute power of disposition, not accompanied by any trust, shall be given to the owner of a particular estate for life or years, such estate shall be changed into a fee, absolute in respect to the rights of creditors and purchasers but subject to any future estates limited thereon in case the power should not be executed or the lands should not be sold for the satisfaction of debts.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1353, ch. 854, § 1041

Section References

This section is referenced in § 42-1008.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-105.
1973 Ed., § 45-1005.